Utah statutes.
63G-6a-704.   Opening of proposals and acceptance.

(1)  An issuing procurement unit shall ensure that proposals are opened in a manner that avoids disclosing the contents to competing offerors during the evaluation process.

(2)  An issuing procurement unit may not accept a proposal:

(a)  after the time for submission of a proposal has expired; or

(b)  that is not responsive to the request for proposals.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

